Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7189.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-29.1 of the General Laws entitled "Pharmacy Freedom of Choice
— Fair Competition and Practices" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-29.1-12. Fair pharmacy reimbursement and anti-discrimination.
(a) Reimbursement parity.
A pharmacy benefit manager shall not reimburse a non-affiliated pharmacy or pharmacist
in an amount less than the net effective reimbursement, inclusive of all fees, adjustments,
incentives, and other remuneration, paid directly or indirectly to an affiliated pharmacy or
pharmacist for the same drug or service.
(b) Anti-discrimination.
A pharmacy benefit manager shall not impose contractual terms, reimbursement
methodologies, performance metrics, or other requirements that have the effect of reimbursing non-
affiliated pharmacies or pharmacists at a lower rate than affiliated pharmacies or pharmacists for
the same drug or service.
(c) Transparency of affiliated reimbursement.
Upon request by the office of the health insurance commissioner (“OHIC”), a pharmacy
benefit manager shall provide reimbursement data reasonably necessary to verify compliance with
this section, including data relating to affiliated pharmacies.
(d) Enforcement.

This section shall be enforced by OHIC and the attorney general pursuant to their existing
authority under law.
(e) Medicaid applicability.
All Medicaid managed care organizations, and all pharmacy benefit managers contracted
by or on behalf of Medicaid managed care organizations, shall comply with the provisions of this
section with respect to all Medicaid pharmacy benefits, whether administered directly or through a
pharmacy benefit manager.
(f) Prohibition on evasion.
A pharmacy benefit manager, insurer, or Medicaid managed care organization shall not
avoid compliance with this section through affiliation structures, subcontracting, differential
pricing metrics, reimbursement methodologies, or contractual arrangements designed to favor
affiliated pharmacies or pharmacists.
(g) Rulemaking.
The OHIC may promulgate and adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement and
enforce this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003517
========
LC003517 - Page 2 of 3